test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-algg_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - âʹlǧǧ a-stem poika: # Noun - full paradigm
     âʹlǧǧ+N+Sg+Nom+Indef: âʹlǧǧ
     âʹlǧǧ+N+Sg+Gen+Indef: ââʹlj
     âʹlǧǧ+N+Sg+Acc+Indef: ââʹlj
     âʹlǧǧ+N+Sg+Ill+Indef: âlgga
     âʹlǧǧ+N+Sg+Loc+Indef: ââʹljest
     âʹlǧǧ+N+Sg+Com+Indef: õõʹljin
     âʹlǧǧ+N+Ess+Indef: âʹlǧǧen
     âʹlǧǧ+N+Par+Indef: âʹlǧǧed
     âʹlǧǧ+N+Sg+Abe+Indef: [ââʹljtaa, ââʹljtää]
     âʹlǧǧ+N+Pl+Nom+Indef: ââʹlj
     âʹlǧǧ+N+Pl+Gen+Indef: õõʹlji
     âʹlǧǧ+N+Pl+Acc+Indef: õõʹljid
     âʹlǧǧ+N+Pl+Ill+Indef: õõʹljid
     âʹlǧǧ+N+Pl+Loc+Indef: õõʹljin
     âʹlǧǧ+N+Pl+Com+Indef: õõʹljivuiʹm
     âʹlǧǧ+N+Pl+Abe+Indef: [õõʹljitaa, õõʹljitää]
